Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-124
Interference; restraint of freedoms; penalty.

Any individual, corporation, or municipality that attempts to interfere with or restrain the exercise of the freedoms referred to in sections 20-123 and 20-132, either by ordinance or otherwise, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars, or be imprisoned for a period not exceeding six months, or be both so fined and imprisoned, and shall stand committed until such fine and costs of prosecution are paid. Each day such violation is committed or permitted to continue shall constitute a separate offense and shall be punishable as such hereunder.

Laws 1969, c. 120, § 20, p. 551.

While injunctive relief for interference with first amendment right to free speech can be granted, the facts herein do not support such relief. Hartford v. Womens Services, P.C., 239 Neb. 540, 477 N.W.2d 161 (1991).